Utah statutes.
32B-4-417.   Unlawful possession by licensee or permittee.

Except as authorized by Section 32B-4-415, other provisions of this title, or the rules of the commission, a licensee or permittee may not possess, store, or allow consumption of liquor on its premises if the liquor is not purchased from:

(1)  the department;

(2)  a state store; or

(3)  a package agency.

